Maryland, session 2026, SB0952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
SUBTITLE 12. CHARLES COUNTY WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR
AUTHORITY.
12–1201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AUTHORITY” MEANS THE WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT
CORRIDOR AUTHORITY.
(C) “BOARD” MEANS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE AUTHORITY.
(D) “BUFFER ZONE” MEANS THE AREA WITHIN 250 YARDS OF THE TARGET
AREA.
(E) “TARGET AREA” MEANS STATE LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS 27A AND 28 IN
CHARLES COUNTY.
12–1202.
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED TO ACCOMPLISH ITS
PURPOSES.
12–1203.
(A) THERE IS A WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR
AUTHORITY IN CHARLES COUNTY.
(B) THE AUTHORITY IS A BODY POLITIC AND CORPORATE AND IS AN
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE.
(C) THE EXERCISE BY THE AUTHORITY OF A POWER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
IS THE PERFORMANCE OF AN ESSENTIAL GOVERNMENTAL FUNCTION.

SENATE BILL 952 3
(D) THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE EACH YEAR IN THE STATE BUDGET BILL
AN APPROPRIATION TO THE AUTHORITY IN CHARLES COUNTY.
(E) BEGINNING FISCAL YEAR 2036, THE AUTHORITY SHALL BE
SELF–SUSTAINING.
12–1204.
(A) THE LEGISLATIVE PURPOSES OF THE AUTHORITY ARE TO:
(1) REVIVE THE VARIOUS COMMUNITIES ALONG THE WALDORF
URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR IN CHARLES COUNTY;
(2) PROMOTE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT;
(3) ENCOURAGE THE INCREASE OF BUSINESS ACTIVITY, COMMERCE,
AND A BALANCED ECONOMY IN CHARLES COUNTY;
(4) HELP TO RETAIN AND ATTRACT BUSINESS ACTIVITY AND
COMMERCE IN CHARLES COUNTY; AND
(5) PROMOTE THE HEALTH, PUBLIC SAFETY, RIGHT OF GAINFUL
EMPLOYMENT, AND WELFARE OF RESIDENTS OF CHARLES COUNTY.
(B) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY INTENDS THAT:
(1) THE AUTHORITY OPERATE AND EXERCISE ITS CORPORATE
POWERS ALONG THE WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR IN CHARLES
COUNTY;
(2) WITHOUT LIMITING ITS AUTHORITY TO OTHERWISE EXERCISE ITS
POWERS, THE AUTHORITY EXERCISES ITS POWERS TO ASSIST PRIVATE REAL ESTATE
ENTITIES AND NONPROFIT COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATIONS TO
DEVELOP AND REHABILITATE HOUSING AND COMMERCIAL UNITS IN CHARLES
COUNTY AND SUPPORT LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AGENCIES TO
CONTRIBUTE TO THE EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION, AND RETENTION OF EXISTING
ENTERPRISES IN CHARLES COUNTY, AS WELL AS THE ATTRACTION OF NEW
BUSINESSES TO CHARLES COUNTY; AND
(3) THE AUTHORITY SHOULD NOT OWN AND OPERATE A PROJECT
UNLESS:

SENATE BILL 952
(I) THE BOARD DETERMINES BY RESOLUTION THAT THE
PRIVATE SECTOR HAS NOT DEMONSTRATED SERIOUS AND SIGNIFICANT INTEREST
AND DEVELOPMENT CAPACITY TO OWN AND OPERATE THE PROJECT; OR
(II) A REPRESENTATIVE OF A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT REQUESTS
IN WRITING THAT THE AUTHORITY OWN AND OPERATE THE PROJECT.
12–1205.
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, IN
EXERCISING ITS POWERS, THE AUTHORITY:
(I) MAY CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE AUTHORITY
WITHOUT THE CONSENT OF ANY STATE UNIT; AND
(II) IS NOT SUBJECT TO:
1. SUBTITLES 1 THROUGH 3 OF THIS TITLE; OR
2. THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE:
A. TITLE 2, SUBTITLES 2 (GIFTS AND GRANTS) AND 5
(FACILITIES FOR THE HANDICAPPED);
B. TITLE 3 (BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT);
C. TITLE 4 (DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES);
D. TITLE 5A (DIVISION OF HISTORICAL AND CULTURAL
PROGRAMS);
E. TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 1 (STUDIES AND ESTIMATES);
F. TITLE 7, SUBTITLES 1 (STATE OPERATING BUDGET),
2 (DISBURSEMENTS AND EXPENDITURES), AND 3 (UNSPENT BALANCES);
G. TITLE 10 (BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS
– MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS); OR
H. DIVISION II (GENERAL PROCUREMENT LAW).
(2) THE AUTHORITY IS SUBJECT TO:

SENATE BILL 952 5
(I) THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT; AND
(II) THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT.
(B) THE AUTHORITY AND ITS OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES ARE SUBJECT TO
THE PUBLIC ETHICS LAW.
(C) THE AUTHORITY AND ITS OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES ARE SUBJECT TO
TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(D) THE AUTHORITY IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
12–1206.
(A) A BOARD OF DIRECTORS SHALL MANAGE THE AUTHORITY AND
EXERCISE ITS POWERS.
(B) (1) THE CHARLES COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL APPOINT THE
MEMBERS OF THE BOARD.
(2) THE CHARLES COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL ESTABLISH
4–YEAR STAGGERED TERMS FOR THE MEMBERS.
(C) THE CHARLES COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL SELECT THE CHAIR OF
THE BOARD.
12–1207.
(A) THE AUTHORITY MAY MANAGE APPROPRIATED FUNDS FROM CHARLES
COUNTY AND THE STATE.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY RECEIVE DONATED SERVICES FROM
ACCOUNTANTS, LAWYERS, OR OTHER CONSULTANTS AS NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE AUTHORITY MAY SUPERVISE, MANAGE, AND TERMINATE STAFF
AND CONSULTANTS AS NECESSARY.
12–1208.
A MEMBER OF THE AUTHORITY:

SENATE BILL 952
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
AUTHORITY; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
12–1209.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL:
(1) SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT AND APPROVAL OF A
COMPREHENSIVE NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION PLAN IN THE TARGET AREA
AND THE BUFFER ZONE TO BENEFIT:
(I) THE RESIDENTS;
(II) HOUSING;
(III) THE NEIGHBORHOODS;
(IV) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT; AND
(V) TRANSPORTATION, INCLUDING MOTOR VEHICLES AND
PEDESTRIANS; AND
(2) WORK IN COORDINATION WITH THE RESIDENTS OF THE TARGET
AREA AND THE BUFFER ZONE TO DEVELOP A COMPREHENSIVE NEIGHBORHOOD
REVITALIZATION PLAN.
(B) THE AUTHORITY MAY, BY A MAJORITY VOTE OF ALL MEMBERS OF THE
AUTHORITY, MODIFY THE BOUNDARIES OF THE TARGET AREA AND THE BUFFER
ZONE.
(C) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 15, 2027, THE AUTHORITY SHALL REPORT
ITS COMPREHENSIVE NEIGHBORHOOD REVITALIZATION STRATEGY, INCLUDING ANY
PROCUREMENT ACTIVITIES UNDERTAKEN BY THE AUTHORITY, TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO
THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE ECONOMIC
MATTERS COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE.
12–1210.

SENATE BILL 952 7
THE AUTHORITY MAY:
(1) ADOPT BYLAWS FOR THE CONDUCT OF THE BUSINESS OF THE
AUTHORITY;
(2) ADOPT A SEAL;
(3) SUE OR BE SUED;
(4) MAINTAIN AN OFFICE AT A PLACE THE AUTHORITY DESIGNATES
IN CHARLES COUNTY;
(5) MAKE OR ACCEPT AND MANAGE LOANS, GRANTS, OR ASSISTANCE
OF ANY KIND FROM THE FEDERAL OR STATE GOVERNMENT, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT,
A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY, A CHARITABLE INSTITUTION, A NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION, A FOR–PROFIT ORGANIZATION, OR A PRIVATE SOURCE;
(6) MAKE GRANTS TO INDIVIDUALS;
(7) ACQUIRE PROPERTIES IN CHARLES COUNTY, DIRECTLY OR
INDIRECTLY, FROM A PERSON OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TO IMPROVE, MANAGE,
MARKET, MAINTAIN, OR LEASE FROM A PERSON OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISION FOR
RESIDENTIAL, COMMERCIAL, OR INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT OR REDEVELOPMENT,
INCLUDING COMPREHENSIVE RENOVATION OR REHABILITATION OF THE LAND OR
PROPERTY ON TERMS THE AUTHORITY CONSIDERS REASONABLE TO OPERATE A
PROJECT IN CHARLES COUNTY, BY:
(I) PURCHASE;
(II) GIFT;
(III) INTEREST;
(IV) CONDEMNATION;
(V) EMINENT DOMAIN, EXCEPT FOR OWNER–OCCUPIED
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTIES;
(VI) TAX SALE;
(VII) FORECLOSURE;
(VIII) RECEIVERSHIP;

SENATE BILL 952
(IX) IN REM FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS;
(X) EASEMENT, OR ANY OTHER INTEREST IN LAND;
(XI) LEASE; AND
(XII) RENT;
(8) ACQUIRE, PURCHASE, HOLD, LEASE AS LESSEE, AND USE:
(I) A FRANCHISE, PATENT, OR LICENSE;
(II) ANY REAL, PERSONAL, MIXED, TANGIBLE, OR INTANGIBLE
PROPERTY; OR
(III) AN INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY LISTED IN THIS ITEM;
(9) FINANCE ALL OR PART OF THE ACQUISITION OR IMPROVEMENT OF
A PROJECT;
(10) SELL, LEASE AS LESSOR, TRANSFER, LICENSE, ASSIGN, OR
DISPOSE OF PROPERTY OR A PROPERTY INTEREST THAT THE AUTHORITY
ACQUIRES;
(11) FIX AND COLLECT RATES, RENTALS, FEES, ROYALTIES, AND
CHARGES FOR SERVICES AND RESOURCES THE AUTHORITY PROVIDES OR MAKES
AVAILABLE;
(12) ENTER INTO CONTRACTS WITH ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCY, A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT, A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY, A
CHARITABLE INSTITUTION, OR A PRIVATE ENTITY OR PARTY;
(13) EXERCISE POWER USUALLY POSSESSED BY A PRIVATE
CORPORATION IN PERFORMING SIMILAR FUNCTIONS UNLESS TO DO SO WOULD
CONFLICT WITH STATE LAW;
(14) WITH THE OWNER’S PERMISSION, ENTER LANDS OR PREMISES TO
MAKE A SURVEY, A SOUNDING, A BORING, OR AN EXAMINATION TO ACCOMPLISH THE
PURPOSE AUTHORIZED BY THIS SUBTITLE;
(15) CREATE, OWN, CONTROL, OR BE A MEMBER OF A CORPORATION,
LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, PARTNERSHIP, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY;

SENATE BILL 952 9
(16) CREATE A SPECIAL DISTRICT BENEFIT FOR THE COMMERCIAL
BUSINESSES IN THE TARGET AREA;
(17) OPEN A BANK ACCOUNT WITH A NATIONAL OR LOCAL FEDERALLY
INSURED FINANCIAL INSTITUTION;
(18) SET SALARIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE JURISDICTION MARKET
RATE AND OUTSIDE THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSION SYSTEM;
(19) CREATE A FORUM FOR STAKEHOLDERS TO COME TOGETHER ON
CREATING A 20–YEAR COMPREHENSIVE PLAN AROUND ECONOMIC, HOUSING,
TRANSPORTATION, NEIGHBORHOOD, AND GREEN SPACE DEVELOPMENT WITHIN
THE TARGET AREA;
(20) SERVE AS A CLEARINGHOUSE AND RESOURCE CENTER FOR
PROMOTING COORDINATION AND COMMUNICATION ON DEVELOPMENT
OPPORTUNITIES FOR THE WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR;
(21) ENSURE MONEY IS BEING SPENT EFFECTIVELY AND EFFICIENTLY
ON DEVELOPMENT AND THAT DEVELOPMENT IS HAPPENING IN THE APPROPRIATE
WAY FOR THE WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR;
(22) PROVIDE ADVISORY SERVICES TO STATE AND CHARLES COUNTY
AGENCIES ON PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR THE TARGET AREA;
(23) INITIATE, FUND, AND MONITOR FOR EFFICIENCY AND
EFFECTIVENESS ECONOMIC, HOUSING, TRANSPORTATION, NEIGHBORHOOD, AND
GREEN SPACE DEVELOPMENT WITHIN THE TARGET AREA;
(24) MAKE RULES AND REGULATIONS FOR THE OPERATION AND USE
OF LAND, PROPERTY, AND UNDERTAKINGS UNDER THE AUTHORITY’S
JURISDICTION; AND
(25) DO ALL THINGS NECESSARY OR CONVENIENT TO CARRY OUT THE
POWERS EXPRESSLY GRANTED BY THIS SUBTITLE.
12–1211.
(A) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ESTABLISH A SYSTEM OF FINANCIAL
ACCOUNTING, CONTROLS, AUDITS, AND REPORTS.

SENATE BILL 952
(B) THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE AUTHORITY BEGINS ON JULY 1 AND ENDS ON
THE FOLLOWING JUNE 30.
12–1212.
(A) THE AUTHORITY MAY CREATE AND ADMINISTER THE ACCOUNTS THAT
THE AUTHORITY REQUIRES.
(B) THE AUTHORITY SHALL DEPOSIT ITS MONEY INTO A CHARLES COUNTY
OR NATIONAL BANK OR A FEDERALLY INSURED SAVINGS AND LOAN ASSOCIATION
THAT HAS A TOTAL PAID–IN CAPITAL OF AT LEAST $1,000,000.
(C) THE AUTHORITY MAY DESIGNATE THE TRUST DEPARTMENT OF A
CHARLES COUNTY OR NATIONAL BANK OR SAVINGS AND LOAN ASSOCIATION AS A
DEPOSITORY TO RECEIVE SECURITIES THAT THE AUTHORITY OWNS OR ACQUIRES.
12–1213.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION OR ASSESSMENTS ON ANY PART OF A
DEVELOPMENT OR PROJECT, THE AUTHORITY’S ACTIVITIES IN OPERATING AND
MAINTAINING A DEVELOPMENT OR PROJECT, AND REVENUES FROM A
DEVELOPMENT OR PROJECT.
(B) ANY PROPERTY THAT IS SOLD OR LEASED BY THE AUTHORITY TO A
PRIVATE ENTITY IS SUBJECT TO CHARLES COUNTY AND LOCAL REAL PROPERTY
TAXES FROM THE TIME OF SALE OR LEASE.
(C) THE AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT FROM STATE AND LOCAL TRANSFER AND
RECORDATION TAX.
(D) THE AUTHORITY IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES AND USE TAX ON
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS FOR A PROJECT IN THE TARGET AREA OF THE BUFFER
ZONE.
12–1214.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE WALDORF URBAN
REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR AUTHORITY FUND.
(B) THERE IS A WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR
AUTHORITY FUND.

SENATE BILL 952 11
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDS FOR THE
AUTHORITY TO USE FOR CONSULTING FEES, SALARIES, AND ADMINISTRATIVE
EXPENSES.
(D) THE AUTHORITY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR ADMINISTRATIVE PURPOSES AND TO
CARRY OUT THE FUNCTIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(H) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND IN
THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.

SENATE BILL 952
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR
AUTHORITY FUND.
11–203.
(L) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THIS DIVISION II DOES NOT APPLY TO THE WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT
CORRIDOR AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE WALDORF URBAN REDEVELOPMENT CORRIDOR
AUTHORITY ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 12 OF THE ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE IS SUBJECT TO TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 AND TITLE 14,
SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.